Maryland, session 2025, HB0450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–718.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW THE
DISABILITY REDUCED FARE PROGRAM CERTIFICATION OF AN ENROLLEE WHO IS
PERMANENTLY DISABLED.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING A
PROCESS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 1 –